Massachusetts, session 194th, H3687.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 7A of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding at the end of the first paragraph the following:-
The Registrar shall adopt rules and regulations to exempt antique automobiles that are 45
years old or older, whose owners are members of a recognized antique automobile club, from the
annual vehicle safety inspection program. Said antique automobiles shall be actively registered
with an antique or year of manufacture registration plate to qualify for this exemption. An
antique automobile exempt under this section that changes ownership shall be required to have a
vehicle safety inspection performed within seven days of being registered by the new owner.
of 1